District of Columbia statutes.
25-353

Notice requirements for moratorium proceedings.

If a moratorium request meets all of the requirements set forth in § 25-352, the Board shall provide notice to the public according to the same procedures as required by § 25-421.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 101(p), 51 DCR 6525

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-187 substituted “§ 25-421” for “§§ 25-421 and 25-422; provided, that, for purposes of this section, the responsibilities of the applicant prescribed in § 25-422 shall be assumed by the Board”.